test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-mieqrr_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - mieʹrr a-stem määrä: # Noun - full paradigm
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Nom: mieʹrr
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Gen: meäʹr
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Acc: meäʹr
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Ill: meärˈra
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Loc: meäʹrest
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Com: meäʹrin
     mieʹrr+N+Ess: mieʹrren
     mieʹrr+N+Par: mieʹrred
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Abe: [meäʹrtaa, meäʹrtää]
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Nom: meäʹr
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Gen: meäʹri
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Acc: meäʹrid
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Ill: meäʹrid
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Loc: meäʹrin
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Com: meäʹrivuiʹm
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Abe: [meäʹritaa, meäʹritää]
